Hawaii statutes.
§607-5 Costs; circuit
courts. (a) The fees prescribed by the schedule
in this section shall be paid to the clerk of the circuit court as costs of
court by the person instituting the action or proceeding, or offering the paper
for filing, or causing the document to be issued or the services to be
performed in the circuit court; provided that nothing in the schedule shall apply to cases of adults charged with
commission of a crime, or to proceedings under section 571-11(1), (2), or (9),
to proceedings under chapter 333F or 334, to small estates including decedents'
estates and protection of property of minors and persons under disability when the amount payable is fixed by
another statute; provided further that the fees prescribed by subsection (c)(32) shall
be deposited by the clerk of the circuit court into the judiciary computer
system special fund pursuant to section 601-3.7; provided further that
the fees prescribed by subsection (b)(1a) shall be deposited by the clerk of
the circuit court as provided in section 667-53(a)(6).

For
the purpose of this section, "judgment" includes a decree and any
order from which an appeal lies.

SCHEDULE

In
the application of this schedule, each case assigned a new number or filed
under the number previously assigned to a probate, trust, guardianship, or
conservatorship, shall carry a fee for the institution or transfer of the
action or proceeding as prescribed by part I, and in addition the fees
prescribed by part II unless otherwise provided.

(b) PART I

Action or proceeding, general:

(1) Civil action
or special proceeding, unless another item in part I applies............................... $200

(1a) Petition
for conversion of nonjudicial foreclosure to judicial foreclosure............................ $250

(2) Appeal to a
circuit court....................... $100

(3) Transfer of
action to circuit court from district court, in addition to district court fees.............. $125

Trusts:

(4) Proceeding
for (A) appointment of trustee; (B) appointment of successor; (C) resignation
of trustee; (D) instructions; (E) approval of investment; (F) approval of sale,
mortgage, lease, or other disposition of property; (G) approval of compromise
of claim, for each such matter................................ $100

(5) Proceeding
for (A) removal of trustee; (B) order requiring accounting; (C) invalidation of
action taken by trustee; (D) termination of trust, for each such matter.......................................... $100

(6) Accounting,
this fee to be paid for each account filed and to include the settlement of the
account..... $10

(7) Vesting
order................. no
charge under part I

(8) Allowance of
fees of trustees, attorneys, or other fees for services incurred in a
proceeding for which a fee has been paid under this section no charge under part I

(8a) Registration
of a trust, or release of registration, under chapter 560................................. $3

(9) Any other
proceeding relating to a trust......... $15

Conservatorship:

(10) Proceeding
for (A) appointment; (B) appointment of successor; (C) resignation; (D)
instructions, unless included in one of the foregoing proceedings; (E), (F),
(G) approval of any matter listed in (E), (F), or (G) of item (4) in relation
to a trust, for each such matter................................................ $100

(11) Proceeding
of the nature listed in (A), (B), (C), or (D) of item (5) in relation to a
trust, for each such matter................................................. $15

(12) Accounting,
same as provided by item (6) in relation to a trust.......................................... $10

(13) Any other
proceeding relating to a

conservatorship............... no charge under part I

Guardianship:

(13a) Guardianship,
including all matters of the nature listed in items (4) to (9), whether in
family or circuit court ................................................ $100

Probate (decedents' estates).
These fees include all matters of the nature listed in items (4) to (9),
without additional charge:

(14) Probate,
administration, domiciliary foreign personal representative, or ancillary
administration, this fee to be paid once only for each decedent's estate.... $100

Family court cases:

(15) Matrimonial
action (annulment, divorce, separation, or separate maintenance)........................... $100

(16) Adoption........................................ $100

(17) Guardianship,
including all matters of the nature listed in items (4) to (9)........ As provided in item 13(a)

(18) Termination
of parental rights no charge
under part I

(19) Any other
family court proceeding, except motions or other pleadings in matrimonial,
adoption, and guardianship actions, but including without limitation custody
proceedings even if in the form of an habeas corpus proceeding................................ $15

(c) PART
II

The fees prescribed by this
part apply without exception.

Jury trial:

(21) Demand
for jury trial, including without limitation probate cases, appeals to the
circuit court, and cases transferred to the circuit court from the district
court, this fee to be paid to the court in which the demand is filed by the
party first making the demand $200

(22) Remand
to district court in cases transferred to circuit court from district court on
demand for jury trial, where jury trial is waived and a remand of such cases to
district court is allowed........................ $50

Miscellaneous:

(23) Filing
of notice of appeal, to be paid in addition to the deposit of appeal costs..................... $100

(24) Search
of records by the clerk.................... $2

(25) Making
of copy; comparing of copy with original; certification or authentication of
notaries

.................... Fees
prescribed by section 92-21

(26) Certification
under seal of copy of pleading or other paper subsequent to the initial filing
of the pleading or paper, except record on appeal................. $1

(27) Exemplification,
instead of item (26)............. $2

(28) Filing
of copy of notice of completion of contract, with affidavit of publication.......................... $3

(29) Filing
of initial paper under section 507-43 by person asserting mechanic's or
materialman's lien (this fee to be additional to the fee prescribed by part I
for bringing an action under section 507-47)......... $15

(30) Filing
of any other paper not in a pending proceeding.................................................. $3

(31) Printing,
publishing, or posting notice; service fees; garnishee fees; mileage charges;
or other services actually performed.............. Amounts necessary to

cover
actual costs or disbursements

(32) For
administrative costs associated with the processing of all civil filings except
those brought by the State or any of the various counties or political
subdivisions of the State.................................... $50.

[RL 1935, pt of §3791; am L
1939, c 19, pt of §1; am L 1941, c 229, pt of §1; RL 1945, §9745; am L 1945, c
94, §1; RL 1955, §219-5; am L 1957, c 316, §§14 to 22; am L 1966, c 22, §6; HRS
§607-5; am L 1972, c 88, §5(g) to (j); am L 1974, c 145, §7; am L 1976, c 200,
pt of §1; am L 1986, c 34, §1; am L 1990, c 34, §17; am L 1991, c 140, §3; am L
1998, c 128, §§2, 3; am L 1999, c 92, §2; am L 2003, c 216, §§3, 4; am L 2004,
c 3, §1 as superseded by c 202, §62 and c 161, §35; am L 2006, c 20, §2 and c
94, §1; am L 2010, c 109, §1; am L 2011, c 48, §15; am L 2012, c 182, §11]

Cross References

Assessment for bench warrant issuance, see §607-8.5.

Fees for other court documents, see §92-21.

Publication of notice, see §601-13.

Rules of Court

See RCC rule 26.

Attorney General Opinions

No fee is required under subsection (b) for an amended
complaint. Att. Gen. Op. 61-77.

Case Notes

Failure to deposit cost at time of filing suit is not fatal
to case. 9 H. 630.

"Costs" must be considered as used in the statute in
its broad comprehensive sense and to include not alone the statutory costs
included in the section eo nomine but also all costs incidentally incurred in
the execution by the circuit judge of the duties imposed upon the judge by law
pertaining to statutory partition. 35 H. 262, 297.

In an equity proceeding an award of an attorney's fee as
damages may not be made where no injunctive relief has been granted, unless
expressly sanctioned by statute. 35 H. 595, 606.

Nonpayment of costs did not render ineffective a timely filed
notice of appeal. 57 H. 168, 552 P.2d 355.

Cited: 35 H. 682, 684, 782; 44 H. 613, 622, 359 P.2d 932.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next